Utah statutes.
41-6a-1632.   Bumpers.

(1) A motor vehicle shall be equipped with a bumper on both front and rear of the motor vehicle, except a motor vehicle that was not originally designed or manufactured with a bumper or bumpers.

(2) (a)  On a motor vehicle required to have bumpers under Subsection (1), a bumper shall be:

(i)  at least 4.5 inches in vertical height;

(ii)  centered on the vehicle's center line; and

(iii)  extend no less than the width of the respective wheel track distance.

(b) A bumper shall be securely mounted, horizontal load bearing, and attached to the motor vehicle's frame to effectively transfer impact when engaged.

(3) If a motor vehicle is originally or later equipped with a bumper, the bumper shall:

(a)  be maintained in operational condition; and

(b)  comply with this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 26, 2005 General Session

